es: Tipo de accionamiento de la cabeza del tapón de drenaje de aceite: Torx externo (E-Torx); Giro manual; Hexagonal; Hexagonal (interno); Estriado; Phillips; Ranurado; Estría; Cuadrado; Torx; Doce puntas; Mariposa; Otro
cs: Typ pohonu hlavy vypouštěcí zátky oleje: Vnější Torx (E-Torx); Pro ruční utažení; Šestihran; Vnitřní šestihran (imbus); Vroubkovaný; Křížový (Phillips); Plochý; Tisícihran; Čtyřhran; Torx; Dvanáctihran; Křídlový; Ostatní
lt-LT: Alyvos išleidimo kamščio galvutės pavaros tipas: Išorinis „Torx“ (E-Torx); Sukamas ranka; Šešiakampis; Šešiakampis (vidinis); Rantytas; Kryžminis („Phillips“); Plokščias; Žvaigždutinis („Spline“); Kvadratinis; Žvaigždinis („Torx“); Dvylikos kampų; Sparnuotas; Kita
zh-CN: 放油螺栓头部驱动类型: 外部梅花 (E-Torx); 手拧; 六角; 内六角; 滚花; 十字; 一字; 花键; 方形; 梅花 (Torx); 十二角; 蝶形; 其他
el: Τύπος κεφαλής βίδας αποστράγγισης λαδιού: Εξωτερικό Torx (E-Torx); Περιστροφή με το χέρι; Εξαγωνικό; Εξαγωνικό (εσωτερικό); Ραβδωτό; Σταυρωτό (Phillips); Εγκοπής; Πολύσφηνο; Τετράγωνο; Torx; Δωδεκάγωνο; Πεταλούδα; Άλλο
ko: 오일 배출 플러그 헤드 드라이브 유형: 외부 Torx(E-Torx); 수동 회전형; 육각; 육각(내부); 널링; 십자; 일자; 스플라인; 사각; Torx; 12포인트; 윙; 기타
hu: Olajleeresztő csavar fejének behajtási típusa: Külső Torx (E-Torx); Kézzel forgatható; Hatszögletű (Hex); Belső hatszögletű (Imbusz); Recézett; Csillag (Phillips); Hornyolt; Bordás (Spline); Négyszög; Torx; Tizenkét szögletű; Szárnyas; Egyéb
fi: Öljyn tyhjennystulpan kannan vääntiötyyppi: Ulkoinen Torx (E-Torx); Käsin kierrettävä; Kuusiokanta; Kuusiokolo; Pyälletty; Ristipää; Talttapää; Moniura; Neliökanta; Torx; 12-kulmainen; Siipikanta; Muu
ro-RO: Tip acționare cu cap de scurgere a uleiului: Torx extern (E-Torx); Rotire manuală; Hexagonal; Hexagonal (intern); Randalinat; Phillips; Crestat; Canelat; Pătrat; Torx; Cu 12 puncte; Tip fluture; Altele
bg-BG: Тип задвижване на главата на пробката за източване на масло: Външен торкс (E-Torx); Ръчно завъртане; Шестостен; Шестостен (вътрешен); Назъбен; Кръстат; Прав; Шлицов; Квадратен; Торкс; Дванадесетостен; Крилчата; Друго
it: Tipo di attacco della testa del tappo di scarico dell'olio: Torx esterno (E-Torx); A rotazione manuale; Esagonale; Esagonale (interno); Zigrinato; Phillips; A taglio; Scanalato; Quadrato; Torx; A dodici punte; Ad alette; Altro
fr: Type d’empreinte de la tête du bouchon de vidange d’huile: Torx externe (E-Torx); À serrage manuel; Hexagonal; Hexagonal (interne); Moleté; Cruciforme (Phillips); Fendu; Cannelé; Carré; Torx; 12 pans; À oreilles; Autre
th: หัวขับปลั๊กถ่ายน้ำมันเครื่อง: ทอร์กซ์แบบภายนอก (E-Torx); หมุนด้วยมือ; หกเหลี่ยม; หกเหลี่ยม (ภายใน); พิมพ์ลายกันลื่น; แฉก (Phillips); แบน (Slotted); สไปลน์ (Spline); สี่เหลี่ยม; ทอร์กซ์ (Torx); สิบสองแฉก; หัวหางปลา; อื่นๆ
nb: Type hode på oljetappeplugg: Utvendig Torx (E-Torx); For hånd; Sekskant; Sekskant (innvendig); Riflet; Phillips (stjerne); Spor; Spline; Firkant; Torx; Tolvkant; Vinge; Annet
nl: Olieaftapplug kop aandrijvingstype: Externe Torx (E-Torx); Handdraai; Zeskant; Zeskant (intern); Gekarteld; Kruiskop (Phillips); Gleufkop; Veeltand; Vierkant; Torx; Twaalfkant; Vleugel; Overig
hr-HR: Tip pogona glave čepa za ispuštanje ulja: Vanjski torx (E-torx); Ručno okretanje; Šesterokutna glava; Šesterokut (unutarnji); Nazubljeno; Križni (Phillips); S prorezom; Žljebasto; Četverokut; Torx; Dvanaesterokut; Krilna matica; Ostalo
pt-BR: Bujão de drenagem de óleo cabeça tipo de encaixe: Torx externo (E-Torx); Giro manual; Hexagonal; Hexagonal (interno); Serrilhado; Phillips; Fenda; Estriado; Quadrado; Torx; Doze pontas; Borboleta; Outro
zh-TW: 機油排放塞頭部驅動類型: 外星型 (E-Torx); 手轉式; 六角; 內六角; 滾花; 十字; 一字; 栓槽; 四方; 星型; 十二角; 蝶型; 其他
de: Typ des Antriebs am Ölablassschraubenkopf: Außentorx (E-Torx); Handbetätigt; Sechskant; Innensechskant; Gerändelt; Kreuzschlitz (Phillips); Schlitz; Vielzahn; Vierkant; Torx; Zwölfkant; Flügelschraube; Andere
tr: Yağ tahliye tapası başlık sürücü tipi: Dış Torx (E-Torx); Elle çevirmeli; Altıgen; Altıgen (iç); Tırtıllı; Yıldız; Düz; Frezeli; Kare; Torx; On iki köşeli; Kelebek; Diğer
sv: Drivtyp för oljeavtappningspluggens huvud: Utvändig Torx (E-Torx); Handskruv; Sexkant; Insex (intern sexkant); Räfflad; Stjärna (Phillips); Spår; Spline; Fyrkant; Torx; Tolvkant; Ving; Övrigt
sl-SI: Vrsta pogona glave čepa za izpust olja: Zunanji Torx (E-Torx); Za ročno obračanje; Šestrobni; Šestrobni (notranji); Narebričen; Križni (Phillips); Z zarezo; Z utori (Spline); Kvadratni; Torx; Dvanajstrobni; Krilati; Drugo
pt-PT: tipo de acionamento da cabeça do bujão de drenagem de óleo: Torx externa (E-Torx); Rotação manual; Sextavada; Sextavada (interna); Serrilhado; Phillips; Fendado; Estriado; Quadrado; Torx; Doze pontas; Wing; Outro
ja: オイルドレンプラグヘッド駆動タイプ: E型トルクス (E-Torx); 手回し; 六角; 六角 (内部); ローレット; プラス; マイナス; スプライン; 四角; トルクス; 12ポイント; 蝶型; その他
pl: Typ napędu głowicy korka spustowego oleju: Torx zewnętrzny (E-Torx); Do obracania ręcznego; Sześciokątny; Sześciokątny (imbus); Radełkowany; Krzyżakowy (Phillips); Płaski; Spline (wielowypust); Kwadratowy; Torx; Dwunastokątny; Skrzydełkowy; Inny
ru: Тип привода головки сливной пробки масла: Внешний Torx (E-Torx); Ручное вращение; Шестигранник; Внутренний шестигранник; С накаткой; Крестообразный (Phillips); Прямой шлиц; Сплайн; Квадрат; Torx; Двенадцатигранник; Барашек; Другое
sk-SK: Typ pohonu hlavy vypúšťacej zátky oleja: Vonkajší Torx (E-Torx); Ručné; Šesťhran; Šesťhran (vnútorný); Vrúbkované; Krížový Phillips; S drážkou; Drážkovaný; Štvorhran; Torx; Dvanásťhran; Krídlový; Iné
en: Oil drain plug head drive type: External Torx (E-Torx); Hand-turn; Hex; Hex (internal); Knurled; Phillips; Slotted; Spline; Square; Torx; Twelve-point; Wing; Other
vi: Loại đầu nút xả dầu: Torx ngoài (E-Torx); Vặn tay; Lục giác; Lục giác (trong); Có khía; Phillips; Có rãnh; Then hoa; Hình vuông; Torx; Mười hai điểm; Có cánh; Khác
da: Drevtype for hoved på olieaftapningsprop: Udvendig Torx (E-Torx); Håndskruet; Sekskant (Hex); Indvendig sekskant (Unbrako); Riflet; Stjerneskrue (Phillips); Kærv; Spline; Firkant; Torx; Tolvkant; Vinge; Andet